Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4401.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 43525c. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, an individual 18 years of age or older shall not hunt pheasants without a current annual pheasant hunting license issued by this state. The annual pheasant hunting license requirement is in addition to the requirements for a base license. The fee for the pheasant hunting license is $25.00. The following individuals are not required to obtain an annual pheasant hunting license under this section: (a) An individual only hunting pheasants at a game bird hunting preserve licensed under part 417. (b) An individual hunting pheasants on private land, except for individuals hunting on land enrolled in the hunting access program. (c) An individual hunting pheasants on public land in the Upper Peninsula. (d) An individual who holds a lifetime small game license, lifetime sportspersons license, or a comprehensive lifetime hunting and fishing license issued under section 44102. (2) If issued as a stamp, a pheasant hunting license must be affixed to the base license of the individual and signed across the face of the stamp by the individual to whom it is issued. (3) A collector may purchase a pheasant hunting license, if it is issued as a stamp, without being required to place it on a base license, sign across its face, or provide proof of competency under section 43520(2). However, a license described in this subsection is not valid for hunting pheasants. (4) Except as provided in sections 43541 and 43555, the department shall deposit the fee collected for each pheasant hunting license in the pheasant subaccount of the game and fish protection account for the purposes stated in subsection (5). (5) The pheasant subaccount is created in the game and fish protection account. The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from any source for deposit into the subaccount. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of the subaccount. The state treasurer shall credit to the subaccount interest and earnings from subaccount investments. Money in the subaccount at the close of the fiscal year remains in the subaccount and does not lapse to the game and fish protection account or the general fund. The department is the administrator of the subaccount for auditing purposes. The department shall expend money from the subaccount, on appropriation, only for costs associated with the purchase and release of live pheasants on state-owned land suitable for pheasants. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor